Oklahoma, session 2025, SB955.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 62 O.S. 2021, Section 34.96, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 34.96. A. There is hereby established the Legislative


Oversight Committee on State Budget Performance. The purposes of


this committee shall include oversight of the implementation of a


system of program performance-based budgeting for implementation by


state agencies.


B. The Committee’s duties shall also include:


1. Development of agency budget request forms and instructions


in conjunction with the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services;

Req. No. 703 Page 1


2. Directing studies to aid in the development of legislative


and procedural changes to further improve the budgetary, financial,


accounting, reporting, personnel, and purchasing processes and


systems of the state;


3. Direction of program evaluation and management studies;


4. Oversight and reporting on executive branch compliance with


the legislative intent of appropriation measures. Such oversight


and reporting duties may include:


a. agency reorganization actions,


b. executive orders calling for reduction of full-time-


equivalents or hiring freezes, and


c. transfer of funds by the executive branch;


5. The development of revenue and expenditure estimates and


analyses;


6. Study of the management, operations, programs and fiscal


needs of the agencies and institutions of Oklahoma state government


pursuant to the Oklahoma Program Performance Budgeting and


Accountability Act;


7. Review of the executive budget, agency strategic plans and


the estimate of needs of each state agency and institution. Reports


may be issued by the Committee as it deems appropriate; and


8. Implementation of an ongoing evaluation review procedure of


existing programs based on performance-informed budgeting techniques


pursuant to the Oklahoma Program Performance Budgeting and

Req. No. 703 Page 2


Accountability Act. The committee Committee in cooperation with the


Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall establish a


schedule to review strategic plans and existing programs for each


agency a minimum of once every four (4) years. The committee


Committee shall issue an evaluation report for each agency once


every four (4) years which will include, but not be limited to, the


following information:


a. a review of the agency’s programs, performance and


management,


b. whether the agency has demonstrated that there is a


need for the services and programs which justifies the


agency’s continued existence, and


c. whether the agency is the most appropriate provider of


the programs and services furnished by the agency.


C. Any reference in the Oklahoma Statutes to the Joint


Legislative Committee on Budget and Program Oversight shall be a


reference to the Legislative Oversight Committee on State Budget


Performance.


D. The Committee shall be composed of three members appointed


by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, three members appointed


by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, two members by the


minority leader Minority Leader of the Senate and two members


appointed by the minority leader Minority Leader of the House of


Representatives. The Chair chair and Vice Chair vice chair of the

Req. No. 703 Page 3


Committee shall rotate every two (2) years between the Senate and


the House of Representatives beginning with a Senate member serving


as Chair chair in 2003. The Committee shall meet at least four (4)


times per year and at other times as called by the Chair chair. The


Legislative Oversight Committee on State Budget Performance shall


function as a committee of the Legislature when the Legislature is


in session and is not in session. Each member of the Committee


shall serve until a successor is appointed. The duties of the


Committee may be performed by the Appropriations Committee of the


Senate and the Appropriations and Budget Committee of the House of


Representatives or subcommittees thereof.


E. The Committee shall be staffed jointly by the staff of the


fiscal divisions of the Senate and the House of Representatives.


F. The Committee may make use of all available teleconferencing


technology to facilitate meetings of the Committee when the


Legislature is not in session. The Committee shall take any


appropriate action to make such teleconferenced meetings comply with


the provisions of the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act, Section 301 et seq.


of Title 25 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


G. The Committee shall periodically meet in different


geographical regions of the state to enhance the Committee’s


understanding of local conditions and to help educate the public as


to the fiscal condition of the state.



Req. No. 703 Page 4


H. 1. Any person offering testimony before the Legislative


Oversight Committee on State Budget Performance, the Appropriations


Committee of the Senate or the Appropriations and Budget Committee


of the House of Representatives, any subcommittee thereof, or any


policy committee of the Legislature shall have an oath administered


that he or she will testify truly, or that any written testimony


provided is true or believed to be true.


2. A person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor if the person


violates the oath required in paragraph 1 of this subsection by


knowingly and willfully:


a. falsifying or concealing any material fact,


b. making any materially false, fictitious, or fraudulent


statement or representation, or


c. presenting any false writing or document.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-703 TEK 1/19/2025 5:46:40 AM









Req. No. 703 Page 5